District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.04

Supplementary medical insurance program.

The Mayor may enter into an agreement (and any modifications of such agreement) with the Secretary under § 1843 of the Social Security Act pursuant to which:

(1)

Eligible individuals (as defined in § 1836 of the Social Security Act) who are eligible to receive medical assistance under the District of Columbia’s plan for medical assistance approved under Title XIX of the Social Security Act will be enrolled in the supplementary medical insurance program established under part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act; and

(2)

Provisions will be made for payment of the monthly premiums of such individuals for such program.

History

Dec. 27, 1967, 81 Stat. 745, Pub. L. 90-227, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-360.
1973 Ed., § 1-267.

References in Text

Section 1843 of the Social Security Act, referred to in the introductory language, is set out as § 1395v of Title 42 of the United States Code.

Title XIX of the Social Security Act, referred to in (1), is set out as 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.

Section 1836 of the Social Security Act, referred to in (1), is set out in § 1395o of Title 42 of the United States Code.

Part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, referred to in (1), is set out as §§ 1395j to 1395w-4 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

Editor's Notes

Private Attorney Contract Authorization: Title XIII of D.C. Law 12-175 authorized the District of Columbia to enter into contingent fee contracts for private attorney services in bringing Medicaid reimbursement litigation.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.